North Dakota, session 69, HB1288.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15.1-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Public schools - Compliance review - Determination by attorney general.
1. An interested person may submit to the state board of public school education a
request for review to determine whether a school district is in compliance with an
education-related state statute.
2. A request for review must be submitted in the manner prescribed by the state board of
public school education. The state board of public school education shall develop a
form for an interested person to initiate the review process.
3. A school district shall provide to the public on the school district website the form
under subsection 2 and instructions to submit the request for review .
4. The attorney general shall:
a. Review the information submitted by the interested person, investigate as
necessary, and determine whether a school district is in compliance with an
education-related state statute; or
b. Dismiss a request for review if the request for review exceeds the purpose of this
section or fails to meet the requirements of the state board of public school
education.
Page No. 1 25.0645.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
5. If the attorney general finds the school district is failing to comply with an education-
related state statute, the attorney general shall advise the school district of the findings
and provide instructions on how to comply with the statute.
6. The attorney general's findings are prima facie evidence in an adjudicative proceeding
under chapter 28 - 32 .
7. The state board of public school education, with the attorney general, may adopt rules
to implement this section.
Page No. 2 25.0645.01000